Massachusetts, session 194th, H2441.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following new
section:-
Section 238. (a) Subject to appropriation, the commissioner of public health shall
establish within the department a diabetes action plan. The department shall develop the plan in
consultation with the health policy commission, the center for health information and analysis,
the group insurance commission and the division of medical assistance.
(b) The diabetes action plan shall identify goals and benchmarks to reduce the prevalence
and impact of diabetes in the commonwealth and develop appropriate state agency and
department plans to reduce the incidence of diabetes in the commonwealth, improve diabetes
care, and control complications associated with diabetes.
of 3

(c) The department, in consultation with the health policy commission, the center for
health information and analysis, the group insurance commission and the division of medical
assistance, shall submit a biennial report by July 1 of each odd-numbered year to the senate
committee on ways and means, the house committee on ways and means, the joint committee on
health care financing, and the joint committee on public health on
(i) the financial effect of diabetes in the commonwealth and its political subdivisions;
(ii) the number of persons affected by diabetes in the commonwealth;
(iii) the number of persons included in prevention and diabetes control programs
implemented by the department and other state agencies, municipalities, non-governmental
entities and others;
(iv) the effects and benefits of implemented programs and activities aimed at controlling
diabetes and preventing the disease;
(v) a description of the level of coordination existing between state agencies with respect
to diabetes prevention, control and treatment and actions taken under the diabetes action plan;
(vi) a description of goals and benchmarks established pursuant to said plan;
(vii) the extent of progress made toward achieving the goals and benchmarks established
pursuant to said plan;
(viii) a description of any additional actions that should be implemented relative to
diabetes prevention, control and treatment;
of 3

(ix) a description of the funding needs for any programs established or recommended
pursuant to said plan; and
(x) recommendations, if any, for legislation relative to diabetes prevention, control and
treatment.
of 3